Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB734.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 502-A of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended to read:Section 502-A. Landlord's Duties.--(a) The retention of control of the stairways, passages, roadways and other common facilities of a tenement building or multiple dwelling premises places upon the landlord, or other possessor, the duty of reasonable care for safety in use. This responsibility of the landlord extends not alone to the individual tenant, but also to his family, servants and employees, business visitors, social 12345678910111213141516171819 guests, and the like. Those who enter in the right of the tenant, even though under his mere license, make a permissible use of the premises for which the common ways and facilities are provided.(b) The landlord shall provide a tenant a habitable dwelling.Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE V-CTENANT RELOCATIONSection 501-C. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Displaced tenant." A temporarily displaced tenant or a permanently displaced tenant."Permanently displaced tenant." A tenant that is required to and does vacate rental housing for 60 days or more because the rental housing is condemned as unfit for human habitation by a municipality or determined to be uninhabitable by another governmental entity with oversight of the property through no fault of the tenant."Temporarily displaced tenant." A tenant that is required to and does vacate rental housing for less than 60 days because the rental housing is condemned as unfit for human habitation by a municipality or determined to be uninhabitable by another governmental entity with oversight of the property through no fault of the tenant.Section 502-C. T emporary displacement. (a) Requirement.--For a temporarily displaced tenant, a landlord shall comply with the provisions of this section within 20250HB0734PN0983 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 60 hours of the posting of condemnation on the rental housing.(b) Alternative offer from landlord.--(1) For a temporarily displaced tenant, a landlord may offer any alternative available dwelling unit of comparable size and rental price for the temporarily displaced tenant and the temporarily displaced tenant's belongings for the full temporarily displaced period.(2) A temporary displacement period shall not exceed 60 days.(3) If a displaced tenant accepts a landlord's offer of an available dwelling unit under this subsection for the remainder of the temporary displacement period, the landlord shall have no other requirements under this article.(c) Movement of tenant's belongings.--(1) At the beginning of a temporary displacement period, a landlord shall either:(i) provide p ayment for the costs of the immediate relocation of the temporarily displaced tenant and the tenant's belongings; or(ii) with the tenant's written approval, move the tenant's belongings at the landlord's expense.(2) At the end of a temporary displacement period, a landlord shall either:(i) provide payment for the costs to move the temporarily displaced tenant and the temporarily displaced tenant's belongings back to the tenant's original rental housing; or(ii) with the tenant's written approval, move the tenant's belongings.(d) Lease terms.--If a temporarily displaced tenant returns 20250HB0734PN0983 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the tenant's original housing, all lease provisions, including provisions regarding the length of the lease term and the amount of rent due at the time of the displacement shall remain in place for the remainder of the lease in effect at the time of the tenant's displacement.Section 503-C. Permanent displacement.If a tenant has been displaced for more than 60 days, the tenant shall be considered a permanently displaced tenant. Within 72 hours of the 60th day of displacement, the landlord shall pay, by check or money order, the following to a permanently displaced tenant:(1) The permanently displaced tenant's security deposit with interest IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS 511.1 AND 511.2 . If the permanently displaced tenant had unpaid debts or arrearages owed to the landlord prior to the rental housing becoming uninhabitable, a landlord may use the security deposit to recoup the unpaid debts or arrearages. The remainder of the security deposit, after the unpaid debt or arrearage has been collected with interest, shall be returned to the permanently displaced tenant.(2) Any pro rata rent for the remainder of the month.Section 504-C. Landlord tenant agreement.A landlord and a displaced tenant may agree to an arrangement, including:(1) The tenant shall have the first right of refusal when the original rental housing is made habitable.(2) A landlord may offer to a displaced tenant any available dwelling unit of comparable size and rental price for the remainder of the lease period. If the tenant accepts an arrangement of the dwelling unit under this paragraph, the 20250HB0734PN0983 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 landlord shall have no other requirements under this article.(3) A landlord may offer to a displaced tenant to be released from the requirements of the written lease early if the rental housing will not be made habitable by the end of the original lease agreement. If a displaced tenant agrees to being released from the lease early, in writing, a landlord shall have no other requirements under this article.Section 505-C. Proof of compliance.Within five days after a tenant vacates the rental housing, a landlord shall provide the local housing authority or municipality with a letter stating that the landlord and the tenant have reached an agreement . Section 506-C. First right to reoccupy.A landlord shall provide a permanently displaced tenant with the first right to reoccupy rental housing once the rental housing becomes habitable and is compliant with all municipal codes. The following shall apply:(1) A landlord shall provide a permanently displaced tenant with written notice of the tenant's first right to reoccupy.(2) The notice provided by the landlord shall include the landlord's current address and telephone number which the permanently displaced tenant can use to contact the landlord.(3) It is the responsibility of the permanently displaced tenant to provide the landlord with the permanently displaced tenant's current address and telephone number to be used for future notification.(4) When the rental unit becomes habitable, the landlord shall give written notice by certified mail to the permanently displaced tenant informing the tenant that the 20250HB0734PN0983 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rental housing is habitable and ready to be occupied.(5) A permanently displaced tenant shall notify a landlord of the tenant's intent to reoccupy the rental housing no later than five days after receipt of the certified letter notifying the tenant that the rental housing is ready to be occupied.(6) A permanently displaced tenant must reoccupy the rental housing within 30 days after the tenant notifies the landlord of the tenant's intent to reoccupy the rental housing.(7) A permanently displaced tenant may waive the right to reoccupy the rental housing at any time after displacement from the rental housing.Section 507-C. Applicability.This article shall not apply to either of the following:(1) A landlord or managing agent who:(i) resides in this Commonwealth and operates less than 15 residential dwelling units within this Commonwealth;(ii) employs an on-site property management team within this Commonwealth;(iii) employs an on-site property maintenance team within this Commonwealth; or(iv) has entered into an agreement with a third-party property management company or property maintenance team within this Commonwealth.(2) If the rental housing is condemned due to:(i) events that are beyond the control of the landlord, including fires, water damage, natural disasters or acts of God; or20250HB0734PN0983 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) damages that are the result of the lack of maintenance, neglect, failure to pay utility bills or other preventative action that could have been taken by the tenant.Section 3. This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB0734PN0983 - 7 - 12345